Final source/morphy/foma/Noun-Neut_BackVowel.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  N +RT +SG +DF +NOM +CJ +NOM +ACC +ID +FN +VOC +PL +DAT +GEN +ABL
LEXICON Root

NounNeutBackVowelStem;

LEXICON NounNeutBackVowel

+N+RT: #;
+N+RT+PL+NOM: #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC: #;
+N+RT+PL+VOC: #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM:ව #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC:ව #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+VOC:ව #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM+CJ:වත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+CJ:වත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM:වයි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+FN:වයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM:වක් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC:වක් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM:වකුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+CJ:වකුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM+FN:වකි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+FN:වකි #;
+N+RT+PL+NOM+CJ:ත් #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC+CJ:ත් #;
+N+RT+PL+NOM+FN:යි #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC+FN:යි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+INT:වෙන් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL:වෙන් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+INT+CJ:වෙනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+CJ:වෙනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+INT+FN:වෙනි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+FN:වෙනි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+INT:වකින් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL:වකින් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+INT+CJ:වකිනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+CJ:වකිනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+INT+FN:වකිනි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+FN:වකිනි #;
+N+RT+PL+INT:වලින් #;
+N+RT+PL+ABL:වලින් #;
+N+RT+PL+INT+CJ:වලිනුත් #;
+N+RT+PL+ABL+CJ:වලිනුත් #;
+N+RT+PL+INT+FN:වලිනි #;
+N+RT+PL+ABL+FN:වලිනි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT:වට #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+CJ:වටත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+FN:වටයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT:වකට #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+CJ:වකටත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+FN:වකටයි #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT:වලට #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT+CJ:වලටත් #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT+FN:වලටයි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:වේ #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:වේත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:වේයි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:වෙ #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:වෙත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:වෙයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN:වක #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+LOC:වක #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+CJ:වකත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+LOC+CJ:වකත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+FN:වකයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+LOC+FN:වකයි #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN:වල #;
+N+RT+PL+LOC:වල #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN+CJ:වලත් #;
+N+RT+PL+LOC+CJ:වලත් #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN+FN:වලයි #;
+N+RT+PL+LOC+FN:වලයි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+LOC:වෙහි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+LOC+CJ:වෙහිත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+LOC+FN:වෙහියි #;

LEXICON NounNeutBackVowelStem
තතු	NounNeutBackVowel;
අසීරුතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
යටගියා	NounNeutBackVowel;
පිටු	NounNeutBackVowel;
වීදුරු	NounNeutBackVowel;
සෙප්පිඩිවිජ්ජා	NounNeutBackVowel;
බහුලතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ද්‍රවශීලතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ඩිප්ලෝමා	NounNeutBackVowel;
කරුණා	NounNeutBackVowel;
වාසනා	NounNeutBackVowel;
පිට්ටු	NounNeutBackVowel;
කථාවස්තු	NounNeutBackVowel;
දෙබොක්කා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ස්ථායිතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
නවකතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
නිරවද්‍යතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
යටිපෝරු	NounNeutBackVowel;
ජුන්ටා	NounNeutBackVowel;
සංඛ්‍යා	NounNeutBackVowel;
තුල්‍යතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
නිනව්	NounNeutBackVowel;
විරැකියා	NounNeutBackVowel;
පරිප්පු	NounNeutBackVowel;
අලුත්වැඩියා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ඔත්තු	NounNeutBackVowel;
කාරණා	NounNeutBackVowel;
රේණු	NounNeutBackVowel;
පබළු	NounNeutBackVowel;
හමු	NounNeutBackVowel;
පිරියා	NounNeutBackVowel;
නින්දා	NounNeutBackVowel;
අගු	NounNeutBackVowel;
රෙජිමේන්තු	NounNeutBackVowel;
තීරු	NounNeutBackVowel;
සාමකමිටු	NounNeutBackVowel;
අග්ගලා	NounNeutBackVowel;
මඳසිනා	NounNeutBackVowel;
වාරු	NounNeutBackVowel;
වකුගඩු	NounNeutBackVowel;
වෙලා	NounNeutBackVowel;
කපරාරු	NounNeutBackVowel;
සඵලතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
පගා	NounNeutBackVowel;
පාඨමාලා	NounNeutBackVowel;
පදිකවේදිකා	NounNeutBackVowel;
විළිවේදනා	NounNeutBackVowel;
සේවා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ගර්හා	NounNeutBackVowel;
වාංමාලා	NounNeutBackVowel;
හාහූ	NounNeutBackVowel;
කොරිඩෝ	NounNeutBackVowel;
අප්පිරියා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ලිඟු	NounNeutBackVowel;
ගොනෝරියා	NounNeutBackVowel;
හෙළු	NounNeutBackVowel;
ගීතිකා	NounNeutBackVowel;
තුංඩු	NounNeutBackVowel;
කැලෑ	NounNeutBackVowel;
කාලතුවක්කු	NounNeutBackVowel;
රේතාණු	NounNeutBackVowel;
හෝදාපාළු	NounNeutBackVowel;
පත්‍රිකා	NounNeutBackVowel;
විධික්‍රියා	NounNeutBackVowel;
තක්සලා	NounNeutBackVowel;
රූපතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ෆෝබියා	NounNeutBackVowel;
සෝෆා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ජරා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ප්‍රතිපදා	NounNeutBackVowel;
සූප්පු	NounNeutBackVowel;
සේයා	NounNeutBackVowel;
අත්දුටු	NounNeutBackVowel;
නියුරෝසියා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ශාඛා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ශ්‍රෝණිමේඛලා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ගිනිසිළු	NounNeutBackVowel;
දයානුකම්පා	NounNeutBackVowel;
විලක්කු	NounNeutBackVowel;
ඉච්ඡා	NounNeutBackVowel;
වියෝ	NounNeutBackVowel;
අනුමෙනු	NounNeutBackVowel;
වක්‍රතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
නෝට්ටු	NounNeutBackVowel;
සමයෝගිතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
දසා	NounNeutBackVowel;
කුසලතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ඔළු	NounNeutBackVowel;
කොන්ත්‍රාත්තු	NounNeutBackVowel;
පත්ඉරු	NounNeutBackVowel;
සිංදු	NounNeutBackVowel;
උදව්	NounNeutBackVowel;
ආපානශාලා	NounNeutBackVowel;
සළු	NounNeutBackVowel;
මිරිඟු	NounNeutBackVowel;
සේනා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ඔංචිල්ලා	NounNeutBackVowel;
කාමාශා	NounNeutBackVowel;
රචනා	NounNeutBackVowel;
සීමා	NounNeutBackVowel;
සංචාරිකා	NounNeutBackVowel;
දලු	NounNeutBackVowel;
ඉලත්තට්ටු	NounNeutBackVowel;
පිළිසිඹියා	NounNeutBackVowel;
නිරෝගිතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
මුසු	NounNeutBackVowel;
වංගු	NounNeutBackVowel;
මුසා	NounNeutBackVowel;
අපූරු	NounNeutBackVowel;
කෙළිබඩු	NounNeutBackVowel;
ගොහොරු	NounNeutBackVowel;
අඩුපාඩු	NounNeutBackVowel;
හෙම්බිරිස්සා	NounNeutBackVowel;
සිහිමුර්ඡා	NounNeutBackVowel;
කර්මාන්තශාලා	NounNeutBackVowel;
වර්ණනා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ස්වස්ථතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
සාළු	NounNeutBackVowel;
සීනු	NounNeutBackVowel;
විරුදු	NounNeutBackVowel;
ආර්ද්‍රතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
තනිතීරු	NounNeutBackVowel;
අනුශූරතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
දේශනා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ගොටු	NounNeutBackVowel;
තීව්‍රතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
නිඝණ්ටු	NounNeutBackVowel;
දෙව්ලො	NounNeutBackVowel;
ඡන්දපත්‍රිකා	NounNeutBackVowel;
කහවුණු	NounNeutBackVowel;
සමුළු	NounNeutBackVowel;
නෝක්කාඩු	NounNeutBackVowel;
මධුරා	NounNeutBackVowel;
තොංඩු	NounNeutBackVowel;
ත්‍රිශික්ෂා	NounNeutBackVowel;
සම්භාවනා	NounNeutBackVowel;
වරෙන්තු	NounNeutBackVowel;
බාධා	NounNeutBackVowel;
තන්තු	NounNeutBackVowel;
අංගපුලා	NounNeutBackVowel;
භූමිකා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ආසා	NounNeutBackVowel;
හිනහ	NounNeutBackVowel;
පුඩු	NounNeutBackVowel;
ඉඟිනළු	NounNeutBackVowel;
ප්‍රදීපිකා	NounNeutBackVowel;
මුද්‍රිකා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ජවනිකා	NounNeutBackVowel;
අපවිත්‍රතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
පුටු	NounNeutBackVowel;
පුරප්පාඩු	NounNeutBackVowel;
ඔට්ටු	NounNeutBackVowel;
වන්දනා	NounNeutBackVowel;
විද්‍යා	NounNeutBackVowel;
කාන්දු	NounNeutBackVowel;
අවිනිශ්චිතතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
අනුශාසනා	NounNeutBackVowel;
තෘෂ්ණා	NounNeutBackVowel;
සණ්ඩු	NounNeutBackVowel;
බිඳු	NounNeutBackVowel;
විචිකිච්ඡා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ආරා	NounNeutBackVowel;
පුදපූජා	NounNeutBackVowel;
පාස්කු	NounNeutBackVowel;
නිහැඬියා	NounNeutBackVowel;
චෝදනා	NounNeutBackVowel;
වට්ටම්තීරු	NounNeutBackVowel;
සිලෝ	NounNeutBackVowel;
ඉරියව්	NounNeutBackVowel;
සමානාත්මතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
අභියාචනා	NounNeutBackVowel;
අච්චු	NounNeutBackVowel;
ගල්කණු	NounNeutBackVowel;
වගු	NounNeutBackVowel;
තන්මාත්‍රා	NounNeutBackVowel;
රජමාලිගා	NounNeutBackVowel;
සංඥා	NounNeutBackVowel;
මේනියා	NounNeutBackVowel;
සිගරැට්ටු	NounNeutBackVowel;
හෙයියම්මාරු	NounNeutBackVowel;
ප්‍රස්තාවනා	NounNeutBackVowel;
මේලා	NounNeutBackVowel;
තෙවතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
අපහසු	NounNeutBackVowel;
මුද්‍රා	NounNeutBackVowel;
පාරමිතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ලංසු	NounNeutBackVowel;
ද්විරූපතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
පස්වරු	NounNeutBackVowel;
විරුද්ධතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
කම්පා	NounNeutBackVowel;
සාත්තු	NounNeutBackVowel;
පෙරවරු	NounNeutBackVowel;
තල්ලු	NounNeutBackVowel;
සොබා	NounNeutBackVowel;
රැකියා	NounNeutBackVowel;
සංවේදීතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
අක්මා	NounNeutBackVowel;
කොමා	NounNeutBackVowel;
කශේරුකා	NounNeutBackVowel;
රක්ෂා	NounNeutBackVowel;
තුරුම්පු	NounNeutBackVowel;
සහයෝගිතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
පාණ්ඩු	NounNeutBackVowel;
විරෝධතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
සමාවයවිකතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ගායනා	NounNeutBackVowel;
සෙක්කු	NounNeutBackVowel;
ජනේරු	NounNeutBackVowel;
සමානතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
අවබෝධතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
කථා	NounNeutBackVowel;
අඩුක්කු	NounNeutBackVowel;
මේනු	NounNeutBackVowel;
උවමනා	NounNeutBackVowel;
බැංකු	NounNeutBackVowel;
යගදා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ආඥා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ඒකාබද්ධතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
වතිකානු	NounNeutBackVowel;
ගල්තලා	NounNeutBackVowel;
පුරාවිද්‍යා	NounNeutBackVowel;
පීඩා	NounNeutBackVowel;
තහඩු	NounNeutBackVowel;
අසාමාන්‍යතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
විස්කෝත්තු	NounNeutBackVowel;
අනන්‍යතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ගතමනා	NounNeutBackVowel;
අව්	NounNeutBackVowel;
පලඳනා	NounNeutBackVowel;
අහිංසා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ඉණා	NounNeutBackVowel;
දේසනා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ගල්රු	NounNeutBackVowel;
චර්යාරටා	NounNeutBackVowel;
අවඥා	NounNeutBackVowel;
දෝනා	NounNeutBackVowel;
තුලා	NounNeutBackVowel;
නගරසභා	NounNeutBackVowel;
රාජාඥා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ධාරිතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
වංශකථා	NounNeutBackVowel;
දොරටු	NounNeutBackVowel;
මඩු	NounNeutBackVowel;
අච්චාරු	NounNeutBackVowel;
ප්‍රවණතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
රසඥතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
බංගලා	NounNeutBackVowel;
නම්‍යතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
කාංශා	NounNeutBackVowel;
අමා	NounNeutBackVowel;
විශේෂඥතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
බළකොටු	NounNeutBackVowel;
ගණනා	NounNeutBackVowel;
හුවමාරු	NounNeutBackVowel;
ජෝගු	NounNeutBackVowel;
නිහඬතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
තවු	NounNeutBackVowel;
කඩතුරා	NounNeutBackVowel;
මාර්කැට්ටු	NounNeutBackVowel;
ශාලා	NounNeutBackVowel;
මෙලො	NounNeutBackVowel;
ඩෙල්ටා	NounNeutBackVowel;
රළපනා	NounNeutBackVowel;
තලා	NounNeutBackVowel;
පපු	NounNeutBackVowel;
අදක්ෂතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
අඩසිනහ	NounNeutBackVowel;
සෘතු	NounNeutBackVowel;
ක්ෂුධා	NounNeutBackVowel;
පහන්සිළු	NounNeutBackVowel;
පූජා	NounNeutBackVowel;
භූමිකම්පා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ගව්	NounNeutBackVowel;
ළණු	NounNeutBackVowel;
සිප්පිකටු	NounNeutBackVowel;
හෝඩුවා	NounNeutBackVowel;
රටා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ප්‍රස්තා	NounNeutBackVowel;
පඩංගු	NounNeutBackVowel;
අඬු	NounNeutBackVowel;
පළිඟු	NounNeutBackVowel;
සර්පිනා	NounNeutBackVowel;
දරණු	NounNeutBackVowel;
මනෝවිද්‍යා	NounNeutBackVowel;
රුජා	NounNeutBackVowel;
තක්සේරු	NounNeutBackVowel;
සම්බන්ධතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
පංකා	NounNeutBackVowel;
වීඩියෝ	NounNeutBackVowel;
වියරු	NounNeutBackVowel;
විශේෂතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
සාක්කු	NounNeutBackVowel;
සමාරාධනා	NounNeutBackVowel;
අන්තර්ක්‍රියා	NounNeutBackVowel;
ඒකාග්‍රතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
තනු	NounNeutBackVowel;
පිඬු	NounNeutBackVowel;
අනෝදා	NounNeutBackVowel;
හීන්සීරු	NounNeutBackVowel;
ස්ප්‍රීතු	NounNeutBackVowel;
රුප්පා	NounNeutBackVowel;
තැනිතලා	NounNeutBackVowel;
අසමබරතා	NounNeutBackVowel;
